Utah statutes.
53-7-310.   License specifications and limits.
(1) (a)  A license issued under this part shall state the name of the person
or persons to whom it is issued.
(b)  The license shall specify the location, by street and number, of the
premises for which it is issued and the particular classification of the
license authorizing the type of staffed plant or facility to be conducted.
(c)  The registration of additional staffed plants or facilities, under
Subsection 53-7-309 (2), shall specify the location, by street and number, of
the premises for which it is issued and the particular classification of the
license authorizing the type of business to be conducted.
(2) (a)  Any license issued under this part is not transferable by the
licensee or licensees to any other person, firm, association, partnership, or
corporation, and is valid only for the particular premises and particular
persons described on the license.
(b)  If there is any transfer or change in the ownership, the change shall be
reported to the board within 30 days.
(c)  A license or registration fee paid under this part may not be refunded
when any license issued is no longer valid because of:
(i)  a voluntary transfer of any nature;
(ii)  revocation under this part;
(iii)  death of the holder;
(iv)  insolvency;
(v)  assignment for the benefit of creditors; or
(vi)  for any other reason determined by rule of the board.
